src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_35NIMI-SG
+N: NMN_35NIMI-SG ;
LEXICON N_35NIMI-PL
+N: NMN_35NIMI-PL ;

LEXICON N_36HANGʼ !!= @CODE@ hangʼ:hang
        N_36HANGʼ-SG ;
	N_36HANGʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_36HANGʼ-SG
+N:     NMN_36HANGʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_36HANGʼ-PL
+N:     NMN_36HANGʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_36SÄRGʼ !!= @CODE@ särgʼ:särg
        N_36SÄRGʼ-SG ;
        N_36SÄRGʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_36SÄRGʼ-SG
+N:     NMN_36SÄRGʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_36SÄRGʼ-PL
+N:     NMN_36SÄRGʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_36PÄIV !!= @CODE@ päiv:päiv
        N_36PÄIV-SG ;
        N_36PÄIV-PL ;
LEXICON N_36PÄIV-SG
+N:     NMN_36PÄIV-SG ;
LEXICON N_36PÄIV-PL
+N:     NMN_36PÄIV-PL ;

LEXICON N_36SILM !!= * @CODE@ silm:silm
!! harmony: front
 N_36SILM-SG ;
 N_36SILM-PL ;
LEXICON N_36SILM-SG
+N: NMN_36SILM-SG ;
LEXICON N_36SILM-PL
+N: NMN_36SILM-PL ;

LEXICON N_36LÄHK !!= * @CODE@ lähk:lähk
!! harmony: front
 N_36LÄHK-SG ;
 N_36LÄHK-PL ;
LEXICON N_36LÄHK-SG
+N: NMN_36LÄHK-SG ;
LEXICON N_36LÄHK-PL
+N: NMN_36LÄHK-PL ;

LEXICON N_KOGÕR
!! kogõr:kogõr
!! * Yaml: __N-kogwr36__
!! derived from 36särgʼ
        N_KOGÕR-SG ;
        N_KOGÕR-PL ;
LEXICON N_KOGÕR-SG
+N:     NMN_KOGÕR-SG ;
LEXICON N_KOGÕR-PL
+N:     NMN_KOGÕR-PL ;

LEXICON N_46SÕBÕR
!! sõbõr:sõbõr
!! * Yaml: __N-swbwr36__
!! derived from 36särgʼ
        N_46SÕBÕR-SG ;
        N_46SÕBÕR-PL ;
LEXICON N_46SÕBÕR-SG
+N:     NMN_46SÕBÕR-SG ;
LEXICON N_46SÕBÕR-PL
+N:     NMN_46SÕBÕR-PL ;


LEXICON N_37PINI !!= @CODE@ pini:pini
        N_37PINI-SG ;
        N_37PINI-PL ;
LEXICON N_37PINI-SG
+N:     NMN_37PINI-SG ;
LEXICON N_37PINI-PL
+N:     NMN_37PINI-PL ;

LEXICON N_37ÕLI !!= @CODE@ õli:õli
        N_37ÕLI-SG ;
        N_37ÕLI-PL ;
LEXICON N_37ÕLI-SG
+N:     NMN_37ÕLI-SG ;
LEXICON N_37ÕLI-PL
+N:     NMN_37ÕLI-PL ;

LEXICON N_38PUNG
 N_38PUNG-SG ;
 N_38PUNG-PL ;
LEXICON N_38PUNG-SG
+N: NMN_38PUNG-SG ;
LEXICON N_38PUNG-PL
+N: NMN_38PUNG-PL ;

LEXICON N_38PULLʼ
 N_38PULLʼ-SG ;
 N_38PULLʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_38PULLʼ-SG
+N: NMN_38PULLʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_38PULLʼ-PL
+N: NMN_38PULLʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_38PUUMʼ
 N_38PUUMʼ-SG ;
 N_38PUUMʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_38PUUMʼ-SG
+N: NMN_38PUUMʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_38PUUMʼ-PL
+N: NMN_38PUUMʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_38SÜÜKʼ
 N_38SÜÜKʼ-SG ;
 N_38SÜÜKʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_38SÜÜKʼ-SG
+N: NMN_38SÜÜKʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_38SÜÜKʼ-PL
+N: NMN_38SÜÜKʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_38HÜTT !!= * @CODE@ hütt:hütt
 N_38HÜTT-SG ;
 N_38HÜTT-PL ;
LEXICON N_38HÜTT-SG
+N: NMN_38HÜTT-SG ;
LEXICON N_38HÜTT-PL
+N: NMN_38HÜTT-PL ;

LEXICON N_38KULD
 N_38KULD-SG ;
 N_38KULD-PL ;
LEXICON N_38KULD-SG
+N: NMN_38KULD-SG ;
LEXICON N_38KULD-PL
+N: NMN_38KULD-PL ;

LEXICON N_38PUTR
 N_38PUTR-SG ;
 N_38PUTR-PL ;
LEXICON N_38PUTR-SG
+N: NMN_38PUTR-SG ;
LEXICON N_38PUTR-PL
+N: NMN_38PUTR-PL ;

LEXICON N_39VIDO !!= * @CODE@ vido:vido
        N_39VIDO-SG ;
        N_39VIDO-PL ;
LEXICON N_39VIDO-SG
+N:     NMN_39VIDO-SG ;
LEXICON N_39VIDO-PL
+N:     NMN_39VIDO-PL ;

LEXICON N_39HÄBÜ !!= * @CODE@ häbü:häbü
        N_39HÄBÜ-SG ;
        N_39HÄBÜ-PL ;
LEXICON N_39HÄBÜ-SG
+N:     NMN_39HÄBÜ-SG ;
LEXICON N_39HÄBÜ-PL
+N:     NMN_39HÄBÜ-PL ;

LEXICON N_40TALO !!= @CODE@ talo:talo
        N_40TALO-SG ;
        N_40TALO-PL ;
LEXICON N_40TALO-SG
+N:     NMN_40TALO-SG ;
LEXICON N_40TALO-PL
+N:     NMN_40TALO-PL ;

LEXICON N_40HELÜ !!= @CODE@ helü:helü
        N_40HELÜ-SG ;
        N_40HELÜ-PL ;
LEXICON N_40HELÜ-SG
+N:     NMN_40HELÜ-SG ;
LEXICON N_40HELÜ-PL
+N:     NMN_40HELÜ-PL ;

LEXICON N_41KAND !!= @CODE@ kand:kand
!! * Yaml: __aig, kand__
        N_41KAND-SG ;
        N_41KAND-PL ;
LEXICON N_41KAND-SG
+N:     NMN_41KAND-SG ;
LEXICON N_41KAND-PL
+N:     NMN_41KAND-PL ;

LEXICON N_41JUHTʼ !!= @CODE@ juhtʼ:juht
!! * Yaml: __juhtʼ__
        N_41JUHTʼ-SG ;
	N_41JUHTʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_41JUHTʼ-SG
+N:     NMN_41JUHTʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_41JUHTʼ-PL
+N:     NMN_41JUHTʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_41AIG !!= @CODE@ aig:aig
!! * Yaml: __aig, aig__
        N_41AIG-SG ;
	N_41AIG-PL ;
LEXICON N_41AIG-SG
+N:     NMN_41AIG-SG ;
LEXICON N_41AIG-PL
+N:     NMN_41AIG-PL ;


LEXICON N_42VARI
        N_42VARI-SG ;
        N_42VARI-PL ;
LEXICON N_42VARI-SG
+N:     NMN_42VARI-SG ;
LEXICON N_42VARI-PL
+N:     NMN_42VARI-PL ;


LEXICON N_43KANARIK !!= @CODE@
        N_43KANARIK-SG ;
        N_43KANARIK-PL ;
LEXICON N_43KANARIK-SG
+N:     NMN_43KANARIK-SG ;
LEXICON N_43KANARIK-PL
+N:     NMN_43KANARIK-PL ;

LEXICON N_43SASLÕKʼ !!= @CODE@
        N_43SASLÕKʼ-SG ;
        N_43SASLÕKʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_43SASLÕKʼ-SG
+N:     NMN_43SASLÕKʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_43SASLÕKʼ-PL
+N:     NMN_43SASLÕKʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_43AASTAK !!= @CODE@
        N_43AASTAK-SG ;
        N_43AASTAK-PL ;
LEXICON N_43AASTAK-SG
+N:     NMN_43AASTAK-SG ;
LEXICON N_43AASTAK-PL
+N:     NMN_43AASTAK-PL ;



LEXICON N_44SÕDA !!= @CODE@ sõda:sõda
        N_44SÕDA-SG ;
	N_44SÕDA-PL ;
LEXICON N_44SÕDA-SG
+N:     NMN_44SÕDA-SG ;
LEXICON N_44SÕDA-PL
+N:     NMN_44SÕDA-PL ;


LEXICON N_45KANA !!= @CODE@ kana:kana
        N_45KANA-SG ;
	N_45KANA-PL ;
LEXICON N_45KANA-SG
+N:     NMN_45KANA-SG ;
LEXICON N_45KANA-PL
+N:     NMN_45KANA-PL ;


LEXICON N_46HAIN !!= @CODE@ hain:hain
!! * Yaml: __N-jalg, N-hain__
        N_46HAIN-SG ;
        N_46HAIN-PL ;
LEXICON N_46HAIN-SG
+N:     NMN_46HAIN-SG ;
LEXICON N_46HAIN-PL
+N:     NMN_46HAIN-PL ;

LEXICON N_46TARK !!= @CODE@ tark:tark
!! * Yaml: __N-jalg, N-tark__
        N_46TARK-SG ;
        N_46TARK-PL ;
LEXICON N_46TARK-SG
+N:     NMN_46TARK-SG ;
LEXICON N_46TARK-PL
+N:     NMN_46TARK-PL ;


LEXICON N_47ASI !!= @CODE@ asi:asi
        N_47ASI-SG ;
        N_47ASI-PL ;
LEXICON N_47ASI-SG
+N:     NMN_47ASI-SG ;
LEXICON N_47ASI-PL
+N:     NMN_47ASI-PL ;

LEXICON N_47KIRI !!= @CODE@ kiri:kiri
        N_47KIRI-SG ;
        N_47KIRI-PL ;
LEXICON N_47KIRI-SG
+N:     NMN_47KIRI-SG ;
LEXICON N_47KIRI-PL
+N:     NMN_47KIRI-PL ;


LEXICON N-1
+N: strong-v-stem ;
+N:%^WG weak-v-stem ;
+N: short-par ;
+N: short-ill ;
+N+Pl:%>i2 shortillpl ;

 
LEXICON strong-v-stem
 nom-strong ;
! +Sg:%>i2 com ;
! +Pl:%>i2 com ;

LEXICON weak-v-stem
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>q K ;
 +Sg: sgpl-cases ;     ! these two lexica for cases with
 +Pl:%>i2 sgpl-cases ; ! the same affix in sg and pl




! Sublexica for the vowel stems
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - 

 LEXICON nom-strong
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
  
LEXICON sgpl-cases
 +Ill:%>he K ;
 +Ine:%>n K ;
 +Ine:%>h K ;
 +Ine:%>hn K ;
 +Ela:%>st K ;
 +All:%>l%^E K ;
 +Ade:%>l K ;
 +Abl:%>lt K ;
 +Tra:%>s K ;
 +Ter:%>niq K ;
 +Abe:%>ld%^Aq K ;
 +Com:%>gaq K ;


LEXICON com
 +Com:%>ne Pxx ; ! Not to K, since Px must be present
                 ! Note that adjectives have -ine without Px

!This Needs to be moved. Here it is adjacent to the source
LEXICON Pxx
+PxSg1: K ;



! Lexica for the non-uniform cases
! --------------------------------

LEXICON short-par
 +Sg+Par:%>%^A K ;
! does not handle valoaan vs. *salaaan

LEXICON long-par
 +Sg+Par:%>t%^A K ;

LEXICON short-ill
 +Sg+Ill:%>%^Vn K ;

LEXICON shortillpl
 +Pl+Ill:%>%^Vn K ; ! CHECK THIS 2013-01-11

LEXICON N-2
+N: # ;

LEXICON N-3
+N: # ;

LEXICON N-4
+N: # ;

!!! N-5
LEXICON N-5
+N: # ;
!kärbläne:kärblä
LEXICON N-kärbläne
+N+Sg+Nom:ne # ;
LEXICON N-kärbläne-PL
+N+Pl+Nom:seq # ;
!elolinõ:eloli
LEXICON N-elolinõ
+N: N-elolinõ_01 ;
LEXICON N-elolinõ_01
+Sg+Nom:nõ # ;

LEXICON N-elolinõ-PL
+N+Pl+Nom:dsõq # ;


!orsikas:orsika
LEXICON N-orsikas
+N+Sg+Nom:s # ;
!meelikäs:meelikä
LEXICON N-meelikäs
+N+Sg+Nom:s # ;

LEXICON N_ELÄNÜQ !!= * @CODE@ elänüq:elänü
    N_ELÄNÜQ-SG  ;
    N_ELÄNÜQ-PL  ;

LEXICON  N_ELÄNÜQ-SG
+N:	NMN_ELÄNÜQ-SG  ;
LEXICON N_ELÄNÜQ-PL
+N:	NMN_ELÄNÜQ-PL  ;

!! !NOMINAL DECLENSIONS

LEXICON NMN_1HANSʼA !!= @CODE@ 1 hansʼa:hansʼa
        NMN_1HANSʼA-SG ;
        NMN_1HANSʼA-PL ;
LEXICON NMN_1HANSʼA-SG
	BACK_SG-NOM ;
	BACK_SG-GEN_ZERO-STEM ;
	BACK_SG-PAR_t ;
	BACK_SG-ILL_htõ ;
+Use/NG:	BACK_SG-ILL_dõ ;
LEXICON NMN_1HANSʼA-PL
:%>dõ	BACK_PL-ALL_lõ-STEM ;
	BACK_PL-GEN_dõ ;
:%>dõ	BACK_PL-ILL_he ;
	BACK_PL-NOM ;
	BACK_PL-PAR_sit ;
:%>dõ PL-COM ;

+Use/NG:%>sii	BACK_PL-PAR_d ;
+Use/NG:%>dõ        BACK_PL-ILL_dõ ;

LEXICON NMN_1VIU !!= @CODE@ 1 viu:viu
        NMN_1VIU-SG ;
        NMN_1VIU-PL ;
