src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
aho:aho N_42VARI  "" ;
aig:aig N_41AIG  "" ;
eloaig:elo#aig N_41AIG  "" ;
hattsaajaq:hatt#saaj N_46HAIN-PL  "" ;
higi:higi N_39HÄBÜ  "" ;
hiir:hiir N_38HÜTT  "" ;
hiussõkarv:hiussõ#karv N_46HAIN  "" ;
hõdõr:hõdõr N_46SÕBÕR  "" ;
hülp:hülp N_36SILM  "" ;
jaanipäiv:jaani#päiv N_36PÄIV  "" ;
jagarik:jagarik N_43KANARIK  "" ;
jago:jago N_39HÄBÜ  "" ;
jauh:jauh N_36SÄRGʼ  "" ;
joosuaig:joosu#aig N_41AIG  "" ;
joro:joro N_40TALO  "" ;
jubi:jubi N_37PINI  "" ;
jutumärkʼ:jutu#märkʼ N_38HÜTT  "" ;
juustunuq:juustunu N_ELÄNÜQ  "" ;
järvejaak:järvejaak N_41KAND  "" ;
kaartʼ:kaart N_38PULLʼ  "" ;
kabi:kabi N_47ASI  "" ;
kabõl:kabõl N_KOGÕR  "" ;
kadsa:kadsa N_45KANA  "" ;
kahrukaar:kahru#kaar N_46HAIN  "" ;
kakõnuq:kakõnu N_ELÄNÜQ  "" ;
katripäiv:katri#päiv N_36PÄIV  "" ;
katõssasada:katõssa#sada N_44SÕDA  "" ;
kelp:kelp N_36SILM  "" ;
kikkakaadsaq:kikka#kaads N_46HAIN-PL  "" ;
kiltpiltʼ:kilt#piltʼ N_38HÜTT  "" ;
kogõr:kogõr N_KOGÕR  "" ;
koib:koib N_38PUNG  "" ;
kolm:kolm N_36SÄRGʼ  "" ;
konvõrentsʼ:konvõrentsʼ N_38HÜTT  "" ;
koolnuq:koolnu N_ELÄNÜQ  "" ;
kotinõgõl:koti#nõgõl N_46SÕBÕR  "" ;
krantsʼnukk:krantsʼnukk N_38KULD  "" ;
krõdsi:krõdsi N_37PINI  "" ;
kuhi:kuhi N_42VARI  "" ;
kuru:kuru N_40TALO  "" ;
kurõmari:kurõ#mari N_47ASI  "" ;
kuulnuq:kuulnu N_ELÄNÜQ  "" ;
kuustik:kuustik N_43KANARIK  "" ;
kuutʼ:kuutʼ N_41KAND  "" ;
kyyrdsilm:kyyrd#silm N_36SILM  "" ;
kärn:kärn N_36SILM  "" ;
käändlepäiv:käändlepäiv N_36PÄIV  "" ;
kõhikõva:kõhi#kõva N_45KANA  "" ;
kõotattʼ:kõo#tatt N_38PULLʼ  "" ;
küür:küür N_36SILM  "" ;
lado:lado N_39HÄBÜ  "" ;
lagʼa:lagʼa N_44SÕDA  "" ;
lehtʼadõr:lehtʼ#adõr N_46SÕBÕR  "" ;
liimʼ:liimʼ N_38HÜTT  "" ;
luik:luik N_38KULD  "" ;
lumõkell:lumõkell N_36SILM  "" ;
luud:luud N_38PUNG  "" ;
lõtv:lõtv N_46HAIN  "" ;
lõunaaig:lõuna#aig N_41AIG  "" ;
maanasynaq:maana#syna N_45KANA-PL  "" ;
maavagõl:maa#vagõl N_KOGÕR  "" ;
manoqkiri:manoq#kiri N_47ASI  "" ;
mihklipäiv:mihklipäiv N_36PÄIV  "" ;
muts:muts N_41KAND  "" ;
mägestik:mägestik N_43KANARIK  "" ;
mäih:mäih N_36SÄRGʼ  "" ;
märssʼ:märssʼ N_38HÜTT  "" ;
määnüq:määnü N_ELÄNÜQ  "" ;
nagõl:nagõl N_46SÕBÕR  "" ;
nihuq:nihu N_40TALO-PL  "" ;
nimisyna:nimi#syna N_45KANA  "" ;
niri:niri N_37PINI  "" ;
nodsʼo:nodsʼo N_40TALO  "" ;
nulk:nulk N_38KULD  "" ;
nyyl:nyyl N_38PUNG  "" ;
nägo:nägo N_39HÄBÜ  "" ;
nõgõl:nõgõl N_KOGÕR  "" ;
olalattʼ:olalatt N_38PULLʼ  "" ;
ollõvaig:ollõv#aig N_41AIG  "" ;
pada:pada N_44SÕDA  "" ;
padi:padi N_47ASI  "" ;
pelg:pelg N_41KAND  "" ;
perrätuulʼ:perrätuul N_36SÄRGʼ  "" ;
pihaaid:piha#aid N_46HAIN  "" ;
pihestik:pihestik N_43KANARIK  "" ;
piht:piht N_38PUNG  "" ;
pikkpäiv:pikkpäiv N_36PÄIV  "" ;
protsentʼ:protsent N_38PULLʼ  "" ;
pudi:pudi N_37PINI  "" ;
pudõr:pudõr N_KOGÕR  "" ;
pulk:pulk N_38KULD  "" ;
päävari:pää#vari N_42VARI  "" ;
põdõr:põdõr N_46SÕBÕR  "" ;
ragja:ragja N_44SÕDA  "" ;
raha:raha N_45KANA  "" ;
rahu:rahu N_40TALO  "" ;
ramm:ramm N_36SÄRGʼ  "" ;
restoranʼ:restoranʼ N_43KANARIK  "" ;
ristipäiv:ristipäiv N_36PÄIV  "" ;
ristʼkablaq:ristʼ#kabõl N_46HAIN-PL  "" ;
ruga:ruga N_39HÄBÜ  "" ;
runk:runk N_38KULD  "" ;
ryym:ryym N_41KAND  "" ;
rõhk:rõhk N_38PUNG  "" ;
savikivi:savi#kivi N_37PINI  "" ;
slovakkʼ:slovakk N_38PULLʼ  "" ;
soetõlv:soe#tõlv N_46HAIN  "" ;
särgʼ:särg N_36SÄRGʼ  "" ;
süümäaig:süümä#aig N_41AIG  "" ;
tagavara:taga#vara N_45KANA  "" ;
tagõl:tagõl N_46SÕBÕR  "" ;
tahtamari:tahta#mari N_47ASI  "" ;
tibitolk:tibitolk N_38KULD  "" ;
tiirada:tii#rada N_44SÕDA  "" ;
tiranik:tiranik N_43KANARIK  "" ;
toga:toga N_37PINI  "" ;
tridsu:tridsu N_40TALO  "" ;
trihtʼ:trihtʼ N_41KAND  "" ;
tsibõr:tsibõr N_KOGÕR  "" ;
tsiripillʼ:tsiripill N_38PULLʼ  "" ;
turi:turi N_42VARI  "" ;
tuur:tuur N_38PUNG  "" ;
tühi:tühi N_42VARI  "" ;
tümp:tümp N_36SÄRGʼ  "" ;
uhi:uhi N_42VARI  "" ;
umbõpalanuq:umbõpalanu N_ELÄNÜQ  "" ;
vahtsõaastapäiv:vahtsõ#`aasta#päiv N_36PÄIV  "" ;
vaiv:vaiv N_46HAIN  "" ;
vana:vana N_45KANA  "" ;
veli:veli N_47ASI  "" ;
vido:vido N_39HÄBÜ  "" ;
viinavõtusynaq:viina#võtu#syna N_45KANA-PL  "" ;
viisʼsada:viisʼ#sada N_44SÕDA  "" ;
viruskuru:viruskuru N_40TALO  "" ;
